Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE F. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 8370. MONTGOMERY COUNTY MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT NO. 112

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8370.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "district" means the Montgomery County Municipal Utility District No. 112.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1294 (H.B. 2238), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8370.101. MUNICIPAL UTILITY DISTRICT POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the powers and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapters 49 and 54, Water Code, applicable to municipal utility districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1294 (H.B. 2238), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 8370.102. NO ALLOCATION AGREEMENT. Section 54.016(f), Water Code, does not apply to the district.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1294 (H.B. 2238), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.